Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE F. PHYSICIANS AND HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS

CHAPTER 1455. TELEMEDICINE, TELEDENTISTRY, AND TELEHEALTH

Sec. 1455.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Dentist" means a person licensed to practice dentistry in this state under Subtitle D, Title 3, Occupations Code.

(1-a) "Health professional" means:

(A) a physician;

(B) an individual who is:

(i) licensed or certified in this state to perform health care services; and

(ii) authorized to assist:

(a) a physician in providing telemedicine medical services that are delegated and supervised by the physician; or

(b) a dentist in providing teledentistry dental services that are delegated and supervised by the dentist;

(C) a licensed or certified health professional acting within the scope of the license or certification who does not perform a telemedicine medical service or a teledentistry dental service; or

(D) a dentist.

(2) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine in this state under Subtitle B, Title 3, Occupations Code.

(2-a) "Platform" means the technology, system, software, application, modality, or other method through which a health professional remotely interfaces with a patient when providing a health care service or procedure as a telemedicine medical service or telehealth service.

(3) "Teledentistry dental service," "telehealth service," and "telemedicine medical service" have the meanings assigned by Section 111.001, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1107), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1174 (H.B. 3345), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (H.B. 2056), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 1455.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan that:

(1) provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including:

(A) an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage that is offered by:

(i) an insurance company;

(ii) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(iii) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(iv) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884; or

(v) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843; and

(B) to the extent permitted by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Section 1001 et seq.), a health benefit plan that is offered by:

(i) a multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined by Section 3 of that Act; or

(ii) another analogous benefit arrangement; or

(2) is offered by an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1455.003. EXCEPTION. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a plan that provides coverage:

(A) only for a specified disease;

(B) only for accidental death or dismemberment;

(C) for wages or payments in lieu of wages for a period during which an employee is absent from work because of sickness or injury; or

(D) as a supplement to a liability insurance policy;

(2) a small employer health benefit plan written under Chapter 1501;

(3) a Medicare supplemental policy as defined by Section 1882(g)(1), Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1395ss);

(4) a workers' compensation insurance policy;

(5) medical payment insurance coverage provided under a motor vehicle insurance policy; or

(6) a long-term care insurance policy, including a nursing home fixed indemnity policy, unless the commissioner determines that the policy provides benefit coverage so comprehensive that the policy is a health benefit plan as described by Section 1455.002.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1455.004. COVERAGE FOR TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL SERVICES, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL SERVICES, AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES. (a) A health benefit plan:

(1) must provide coverage for a covered health care service or procedure delivered by a preferred or contracted health professional to a covered patient as a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service on the same basis and to the same extent that the plan provides coverage for the service or procedure in an in-person setting; and

(2) may not:

(A) exclude from coverage a covered health care service or procedure delivered by a preferred or contracted health professional to a covered patient as a telemedicine medical service, a teledentistry dental service, or a telehealth service solely because the covered health care service or procedure is not provided through an in-person consultation; and

(B) subject to Subsection (c), limit, deny, or reduce coverage for a covered health care service or procedure delivered as a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service based on the health professional's choice of platform for delivering the service or procedure.

(b) A health benefit plan may require a deductible, a copayment, or coinsurance for a covered health care service or procedure delivered by a preferred or contracted health professional to a covered patient as a telemedicine medical service, a teledentistry dental service, or a telehealth service. The amount of the deductible, copayment, or coinsurance may not exceed the amount of the deductible, copayment, or coinsurance required for the covered health care service or procedure provided through an in-person consultation.

(b-1) Subsection (b) does not authorize a health benefit plan to charge a separate deductible that applies only to a covered health care service or procedure delivered as a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), a health benefit plan is not required to provide coverage for a telemedicine medical service, a teledentistry dental service, or a telehealth service provided by only synchronous or asynchronous audio interaction, including:

(1) an audio-only telephone consultation;

(2) a text-only e-mail message; or

(3) a facsimile transmission.

(d) A health benefit plan may not impose an annual or lifetime maximum on coverage for covered health care services or procedures delivered as telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, or telehealth services other than the annual or lifetime maximum, if any, that applies in the aggregate to all items and services and procedures covered under the plan.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1107), Sec. 6, eff. January 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1174 (H.B. 3345), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (H.B. 2056), Sec. 27, eff. January 1, 2022.

Sec. 1455.005. RULES. Subject to Section 111.004, Occupations Code, the commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.002(10), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1455.006. TELEMEDICINE MEDICAL SERVICES, TELEDENTISTRY DENTAL SERVICES, AND TELEHEALTH SERVICES STATEMENT. (a) Each issuer of a health benefit plan shall adopt and display in a conspicuous manner on the health benefit plan issuer's Internet website the issuer's policies and payment practices for telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, and telehealth services.

(b) This section does not require an issuer of a health benefit plan to display negotiated contract payment rates for health professionals who contract with the issuer to provide telemedicine medical services, teledentistry dental services, or telehealth services.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1107), Sec. 7, eff. January 1, 2018.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 811 (H.B. 2056), Sec. 28, eff. January 1, 2022.